Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 15
METROPOLITAN FOOTBALL STADIUM DISTRICT ACT

Section

32-15-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Metropolitan Football Stadium District Act".

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1054, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

There is a question of whether Mile High stadium is viable physically and economically;

The general assembly and the public are in need of a full and objective review of the viability of Mile High stadium and the possible need for renovating Mile High stadium or for constructing a new football stadium, including the costs and benefits associated with the renovation of Mile High stadium or the construction and operation of a new football stadium in the metropolitan Denver area;

This needed review is best accomplished by an independent body, the metropolitan football stadium district.

Therefore, the general assembly has enacted this article creating the metropolitan football stadium district.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1054, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1487, § 1, effective June 3.

32-15-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of directors of the metropolitan football stadium district created in section 32-15-105.

"Commission" means the football stadium site selection commission created in section 32-15-128.

"Director" means a member of the board.

"District" means the metropolitan football stadium district created in section 32-15-104.

"Franchise" means the contractual right granted to any individual, group of individuals, or entity to own and operate a national football league team in a specified location.

(5.5) "Renovate" means a substantial addition to, or to substantially remodel, redevelop, or otherwise improve, Mile High stadium for use as a stadium, as defined in this section.

"Special obligation bonds" means the bonds issued by the district pursuant to the provisions of section 32-15-113.

"Stadium" means a sports facility that is designed for use primarily as a national football league football stadium, which meets criteria established by the board, which meets criteria that may be established by the national football league, and that may include, but is not limited to, such features as parking areas, sky boxes, and press boxes that are necessary or desirable for such sports facility.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1055, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(5.5) added, p. 1487, § 2, effective June 3.

32-15-104. Creation of district - area of district.

There is hereby created a district to be known and designated as the metropolitan football stadium district. The district shall be a body corporate and politic and a political subdivision of the state. Except as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section, the area comprising the district shall consist of:

That area comprising the regional transportation district, as specified in section 32-9-106 as it existed on May 23, 1996; and

That area comprising the regional transportation district as specified in sections 32-9-106.3, 32-9-106.4, and 32-9-106.6 as said sections existed on May 23, 1996, unless rejected by the eligible electors as provided in said sections. Except as otherwise provided by law, the area shall not include areas included in the regional transportation district pursuant to section 32-9-106.7.

(1.5) On and after April 22, 1998, the district shall, in addition to any areas listed under subsection (1) of this section, consist of the following areas:

That area within the city of Lone Tree, state of Colorado, that, as of April 22, 1998, is zoned for commercial use and is within sections 3, 4, and 5, township 6 south, range 67 west of the sixth principal meridian, county of Douglas, state of Colorado; and

That area east of Yosemite street, south of County Line road, west of Interstate 25 and within section 3, township 6 south, range 67 west of the sixth principal meridian, county of Douglas, state of Colorado.

Each of the directors, officers, and employees of the district shall be a public employee for purposes of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1055, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

IP(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 499, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 99:

(1)(b) amended, p. 420, § 6, effective April 30.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 835, § 9, effective May 14.

Editor's note:

The Douglas county district court ruled that subsection (1.5)(a), which included the commercial areas of the city of Lone Tree in the stadium district, was unconstitutional. The court's order was not appealed. City of Lone Tree v. Metropolitan Football Stadium District, Case No. 98 CV 349, Douglas county district court, order dated October 28, 1998.

32-15-104.3. District area - town of Castle Rock in Douglas county.

In consideration of the fact that various noncontiguous parcels containing less than twenty percent of the residents of the town of Castle Rock are included in the district, the voters within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock may elect to consolidate the status of the town of Castle Rock as completely included in or completely excluded from the boundaries of the district at an election held pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

The outcome of any election held pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall apply to any area that is annexed by the town of Castle Rock on or after the date of such election, regardless of whether the area was included within the boundaries of the district before the election.

Pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the area included within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock may be included in or excluded from the district if the following requirements are met:

Two proposals, one to include the area and one to exclude the area, are initiated by any of the following methods:

Two petitions, one requesting an election for the purpose of including the area in the district and one requesting an election for the purpose of excluding the area from the district, are each signed by at least five percent of the registered electors within the town of Castle Rock and submitted to the governing body of the town of Castle Rock; or

The governing body of the town of Castle Rock adopts two resolutions, one to hold an election for the purpose of including the area in the district and one to hold an election for the purpose of excluding the area from the district.

An election is held and conducted in accordance with articles 1 to 13 of title 1 or article 10 of title 31, C.R.S., as applicable, and the following requirements:

The election is held either at the odd-year election held on the first Tuesday in November of 2005 or any regular local district election for the town of Castle Rock held thereafter, as determined by the governing body of the town of Castle Rock. The town of Castle Rock shall pay the costs of such elections.

One ballot question provides for all of the registered electors in the town of Castle Rock to vote for or against the inclusion of the proposed area in the district and one ballot question provides for all of the registered electors in the town of Castle Rock to vote for or against the exclusion of the area from the district.

Each ballot question specifies that the area proposed to be included in or excluded from the district, as applicable, is all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock.

Each ballot question contains the current rates of sales and use tax levied by the district.

The ballot contains both of the following questions:

"Shall the area described in the ballot be included in the metropolitan football stadium district and subject to taxation by the district?"; and

"Shall the area described in the ballot be excluded from the metropolitan football stadium district and not subject to taxation by the district?".

In the event that either the ballot question to include all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock in the district or the ballot question to exclude all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock from the district is approved by a majority of the registered electors who voted in the election and the other ballot question is not approved by a majority of the registered electors who voted in the election, the ballot question that was approved by a majority of the registered electors who voted in the election shall take effect.

In the event that both the ballot question to include all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock in the district and the ballot question to exclude all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock from the district are approved by a majority of the registered electors who voted in the election, only the ballot question that receives the larger number of votes in favor of the question shall take effect.

In the event that neither the ballot question to include all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock in the district nor the ballot question to exclude all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock from the district is approved by a majority of registered electors who voted in the election, neither of the ballot questions shall take effect and the boundaries of the district shall continue to include the parts of the town of Castle Rock that were included in the district before such election.

In the event that the registered electors of the town of Castle Rock elect to be included within the boundaries of the district, the town of Castle Rock shall grant the department of revenue any costs it incurs in carrying out the requirements of this section.

Under no circumstance shall any moneys from the general fund be appropriated to the department of revenue or any other department to cover the costs incurred in carrying out the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 682, § 2, effective August 4.

32-15-104.5. Annexation of enclaves.

When any unincorporated territory is entirely contained within the boundaries of the district, the board may, by resolution, annex the territory to the district. The board shall give notice of a proposed annexation resolution by publishing a copy of the resolution once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the territory proposed to be annexed. The board shall also send a copy of the proposed annexation resolution by registered mail to the board of county commissioners and county attorney of the county containing the territory to be annexed, to any special district or school district having territory within the territory to be annexed, and to the executive director of the department of revenue. The first publication of the notice and the mailing of the proposed annexation resolution shall occur at least thirty days prior to the final adoption of the resolution, and the board shall allow interested persons to testify for or against the resolution at a public hearing held prior to the final adoption of the resolution.

No territory may be annexed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if any part of the district boundary or area surrounding the territory consists of public rights-of-way, including streets and alleys, that are not immediately adjacent to the district on the side of the right-of-way opposite to the territory.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 822, § 3, effective August 8.

32-15-105. Board of directors - membership - qualifications.

The district shall be governed by a board of directors which shall consist of nine directors as follows:

Six directors representing the counties and the city and county of Denver in the metropolitan Denver area of which one director shall be appointed by the county commissioners of each of the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, and Jefferson and one director shall be appointed by the mayor and the city council of the city and county of Denver;

Two directors at large appointed by the governor; and

The chairperson of the board of directors of the Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district created in section 32-14-106.

The directors shall be appointed for four-year terms.

All directors appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall reside within the geographical boundaries of the district. No director shall be a paid employee of the franchise.

All directors appointed pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall have expertise in one or more areas that are relevant to the performance of the powers and duties of the board. Such areas of expertise may include, but are not limited to: Public finance; private finance; commercial law; commercial real estate; real estate development; general contracting; architecture; and administration of football operations.

The directors shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson from among the membership of the board.

All business of the board shall be conducted at regular or special meetings that shall be held within the geographical boundaries of the district and that shall be open to the public. The provisions of this subsection (6) and part 4 of article 6 of title 24, C.R.S., shall apply to all meetings of the board.

Board action shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the total membership of the board.

Directors of the board shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for their necessary expenses while serving as directors of the board.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1055, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 74, § 99, effective February 25.

32-15-106. Board of directors - powers and duties.

In addition to any other powers specifically granted to the board in this article 15, the board has the following duties and powers:

To review any reports and studies made and to obtain any additional reports and studies it deems necessary pertaining to the costs of maintaining and repairing Mile High stadium and the costs of renovating Mile High stadium or building a new stadium and to make a determination of whether it is more cost effective and economically viable to renovate Mile High stadium or build a new stadium than to maintain and repair Mile High stadium;

To require such documentation as the board determines necessary showing that the franchise has been or will be released from its existing lease for use of a stadium before a lease between the district and the franchise for use of the new or renovated stadium commences;

To negotiate an agreement with the franchise requiring the franchise to pay twenty-five percent of the actual construction costs of the stadium, including but not limited to professional fees, site acquisition costs, and materials and labor costs and requiring the franchise to pay for twenty-five percent of all costs in excess of the anticipated construction costs;

To negotiate the lease of Mile High stadium if it is renovated or the new stadium as set forth in section 32-15-122;

To provide the counties within the district and the city and county of Denver with a benefit from a portion of the revenues, other than sales tax revenues and admissions tax revenues, derived from the operation of Mile High stadium if it is renovated or the new stadium during the period of time the district is collecting the sales tax or the admissions tax or such longer period as the board may determine appropriate;

After completion of the review, negotiations, and other matters set forth in paragraphs (a) to (e) of this subsection (1) and if the board determines that there is a need to renovate Mile High stadium or to construct a new stadium and that the renovation of Mile High stadium or the construction of a new stadium is more cost effective and economically viable than maintaining and repairing Mile High stadium, the board shall then determine whether it is more cost effective and economically viable to renovate Mile High stadium or to construct a new stadium, after which the board shall adopt a resolution that, in addition to the statements required by section 32-15-107 (1)(b), includes, but shall not be limited to, the following declarations:

That the board has reviewed the reports and studies pertaining to the costs of repairing and maintaining Mile High stadium, the costs of renovating Mile High stadium, and the costs of building a new stadium and has made a determination that there is a need to renovate Mile High stadium or to construct a new stadium and that the renovation of Mile High stadium or the construction of a new stadium is more cost effective and economically viable than maintaining and repairing Mile High stadium;

(I.5) That it is more cost effective and economically viable to renovate Mile High stadium or that it is more cost effective and economically viable to construct a new stadium;

That the board has received adequate documentation assuring the board that the franchise has been or will be released from its existing lease for use of a stadium before a lease between the district and the franchise for use of the renovated or new stadium commences;

That the district has entered into an agreement with the franchise that requires the franchise to provide twenty-five percent of the actual construction costs of the stadium, including but not limited to professional fees, site acquisition costs, and materials and labor costs and that requires the franchise to pay for twenty-five percent of all costs in excess of the anticipated construction costs;

(III.5) That the board, if it has determined that it is more cost effective and economically viable to renovate Mile High stadium than to build a new stadium, has entered into a conditional or option contract or otherwise assured the acquisition of Mile High stadium, including any lands and interests in real and personal property commonly used for parking facilities, stadium facilities, and stadium site access, plus any additional lands and interests in real property as may be necessary for parking facilities, stadium facilities, and stadium site access;

If the board has determined that it is more cost effective and economically viable to build a new stadium, that the commission has selected a site for construction of the stadium, a statement of the location of the site, and that the board has entered into a conditional or option contract or otherwise assured the acquisition of the selected stadium site and such other lands and interests in real and personal property as may be necessary for parking facilities, stadium facilities, and stadium site access;

That the district has entered into a lease of Mile High stadium if it is renovated or the new stadium with the franchise for the use of the stadium that meets the requirements set forth in section 32-15-122; and

That the board will provide the counties within the district and the city and county of Denver with a benefit from the revenues, other than sales tax revenues and admissions tax revenues, derived from the operation of Mile High stadium if it is renovated or the new stadium during the period of time the district is collecting the sales tax or the admissions tax or such longer period as the board may determine appropriate;

If the board has determined that it is more cost effective and economically viable to renovate Mile High stadium, to enter into a conditional or option contract on behalf of the district or otherwise assure the acquisition of Mile High stadium, and such other lands and interests in real and personal property commonly used for parking facilities, stadium facilities, and stadium site access, plus any additional lands and interests in real property as may be necessary for parking facilities, stadium facilities, and stadium site access;

If the board has determined that it is more cost effective and economically viable to construct a new stadium, to enter into a conditional or option contract on behalf of the district or otherwise assure the acquisition of the selected site for the new stadium and such other lands and interests in real and personal property as may be necessary for parking facilities, stadium facilities, and stadium site access;

In designing and constructing a new stadium, to arrange and coordinate the provision of mass transit, including light rail, buses, and other forms of public transportation to service such stadium with the regional transportation district;

To fix the time and place at which its regular and special meetings shall be held within the geographical boundaries of the district;

To adopt and, from time to time, amend or repeal rules of procedure and bylaws not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state;

To hire such permanent and temporary staff as may be necessary to assist the board in its duties;

To sue and be sued;

To maintain an office at such place as it may designate within the geographical boundaries of the district;

To exercise all powers necessary and requisite for the accomplishment of the purposes for which the district is organized and capable of being delegated by the general assembly; and no enumeration of particular powers granted shall be construed to impair any general grant of power contained in this article or to limit any such grant to powers of the same class as those so enumerated;

To enter into and execute all contracts, leases, intergovernmental agreements, and other instruments in writing necessary or proper to the accomplishment of the purposes of this article, including, but not limited to, intergovernmental agreements concerning revenue sharing;

To engage the services of private consultants and legal counsel to render professional and technical assistance and advice in carrying out the purposes of this article;

To receive and accept from any source aid or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied to carry out the purposes of this article 15 subject to the conditions upon which the grants or contributions are made; except that no public money from the state, any city, town, city and county, or county, and any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States of America shall be accepted or expended for any purpose set forth in this article 15. Notwithstanding any provision set forth in this subsection (1)(p), the board shall not be prohibited from receiving public money from the economic development commission created pursuant to section 24-46-102 (1) that is paid from the economic development fund created pursuant to section 24-46-105.

After the board has completed the review and negotiations set forth in paragraphs (a) to (e) of subsection (1) of this section and if the board has received notice from the secretary of state stating that a valid petition has been filed and verified and has adopted a resolution pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section, in addition to any powers granted to the board in subsection (1) of this section or in this article, the board shall have the following powers and duties:

To submit the question specified in section 32-15-107 (1) to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district at the 1998 general election;

To contract for the planning, design, renovation, equipment, preservation, operation, maintenance, and public transportation to Mile High stadium, if it is renovated, or the planning, design, construction, equipment, preservation, operation, maintenance, and public transportation to a new stadium and all necessary works incidental thereto;

Repealed.

To enter into such contracts as may be authorized in this article including, but not limited to, contracts for the lease and sale of a stadium;

To establish criteria for the renovation of Mile High stadium or for the construction and design of a new stadium including, but not limited to, a requirement that the new stadium have a seating capacity at least equivalent to the seating capacity of Mile High stadium;

To acquire on behalf of the district the selected stadium site for a new stadium, or Mile High stadium if it is to be renovated, and such other lands and interests in real and personal property as may be necessary for parking facilities, stadium facilities, and stadium site access, by gift, contract, or other means; except that nothing in this paragraph (f) shall be construed to authorize the board to exercise the power of eminent domain pursuant to the applicable provisions of articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S.;

If Mile High stadium is to be renovated, to arrange with the City and County of Denver to plan, replan, zone, or rezone any part of the stadium site or any other lands or interests in real property acquired in connection with the acquisition, renovation, maintenance, and operation of the stadium by the district pursuant to the provisions of this article;

If a new stadium is to be built, to arrange with the city, town, city and county, or county in which the selected stadium site is located to plan, replan, zone, or rezone any part of the selected stadium site, in connection with the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the stadium proposed or being undertaken by the district pursuant to the provisions of this article;

If Mile High stadium is to be renovated, to consult with the franchise and other potential users before acquiring the stadium, establishing criteria for the renovation and redesign of the stadium, or contracting for the renovation of the stadium;

If a new stadium is to be built, to consult with the franchise before acquiring a stadium site, establishing criteria for the construction and design of a stadium, or contracting for the construction of a stadium;

To borrow money, contract to borrow money for the purpose of issuing bond anticipation notes pursuant to article 14 of title 29, C.R.S., contract to borrow money for the purpose of issuing special obligation bonds, and issue obligations for any of its corporate purposes and to fund such obligations, to refinance such obligations even if, in the case of refinancing or refunding bond anticipation notes, such refinancing or refunding is at a higher interest rate, and to refund such obligations as provided in this article subject to the requirements of section 20 of article X of the state constitution;

To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets and liability for personal injury to or damage to property of others in such amounts and from such insurers as are necessary and reasonable for governmental entities owning similar facilities in the district;

To procure insurance or guarantees from any public or private entity, including, but not limited to, the state, any city, town, city and county, or county or any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States of America for payment of any obligations issued by the district, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance;

To acquire, dispose of, and encumber real and personal property including, without limitation, rights and interests in property, leases, and easements necessary to the functions or the operation of the district; except that nothing in this paragraph (l) shall be construed to authorize the board to exercise the power of eminent domain pursuant to the applicable provisions of articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S.;

To fix and, from time to time, to increase or decrease fees, rentals, rates, tolls, penalties, or other charges for services, programs, or facilities furnished by the district in connection with the operation of Mile High stadium if it is renovated or the new stadium, and the board may pledge such revenues or any portion thereof for the payment of any indebtedness of the district as provided in this article;

To levy and collect a sales tax pursuant to the provisions of this article, subject to the requirements of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, and the board may pledge such sales tax revenues or any portion thereof for the payment of any indebtedness of the district;

To levy and collect, if the board so determines, a tax upon admissions to a new stadium constructed by the district pursuant to the provisions of this article, subject to the requirements of section 20 of article X of the state constitution;

To invest moneys received by the district pursuant to the provisions of this article in accordance with the provisions of part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.;

To administer and use moneys received by the district in accordance with the provisions of this article;

To develop reporting and review requirements governing the receipt and expenditures of any moneys received by the district pursuant to this article;

To deposit any moneys of the district in any banking institution or savings and loan association within the state as authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., and to appoint, for purposes of making such deposits, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the district, who may be required to give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board may require.

If Mile High stadium is renovated or if a new stadium is built, the board may sell or lease the name of the stadium and any symbol or image of the general design, appearance, or configuration of the stadium, including trademarks, service marks, trade names, and logos. Prior to making a determination to sell or lease the name of the stadium, the board shall assess the costs and benefits of such sale or lease and specifically consider the public sentiment and any other benefits associated with retaining the name "Mile High stadium" or with using any other name that reflects the geographical, historical, cultural, spiritual, or other qualities of the state. All proceeds from such sale or lease, if any, shall be used by the board to pay the principal, interest, and prepayment premium, if any, on outstanding special obligation bonds issued by the board pursuant to the provisions of this article.

The board shall not use any money received from the franchise to accomplish or exercise any powers and duties of the board prior to the holding of the election authorized pursuant to section 32-15-107.

In carrying out its duties in connection with the operation of the stadium, the board shall duly consider:

That all food and beverage concession contracts at the new stadium, or at Mile High stadium if it is renovated, be competitively bid in accordance with the provisions of article 103 of title 24, C.R.S.;

That, for all food and beverage concession contracts, due consideration be given to persons or businesses that are authorized to transact business in Colorado and that:

Maintain their principal place of business in Colorado; or

Maintain a place of business in Colorado and that have filed unemployment compensation reports in at least seventy-five percent of the eight quarters immediately before commencement of the contract; or

Are minority-owned independent businesses; and

That not less than fifteen percent of the total square footage allocated for food and beverage sales at Mile High stadium if it is renovated or at the new stadium shall be occupied, either directly or through subcontracts, by persons or businesses that maintain their principal place of business in Colorado.

The board shall study, consider, and pursue opportunities for privatizing the costs of acquiring Mile High stadium or acquiring a stadium site for a new stadium, the costs of renovating Mile High stadium or constructing a new stadium, or the costs of operating a stadium in order to minimize the use of sales tax revenues to the greatest extent possible for the purposes of this article 15. Such methods to be studied, considered, and pursued by the board in order to achieve such privatization shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Financial incentives from private sources, including landowners and developers, available to offset the cost of a stadium site and the construction of a new stadium, the cost of renovating Mile High stadium, and the cost of maintenance, and operation of a stadium, including, but not limited to: Contributions of money, goods, equipment, and services; financed purchase of an asset agreements; certificate of participation agreements; sale-leaseback agreements; and joint venture proposals;

The sale or lease of seat rights;

The sale or lease of luxury suites, commonly referred to as sky boxes; and

The sale of long-term advertising, parking, and concession rights.

The board shall study and consider whether it would be beneficial to use a tax other than the sales and use tax authorized in section 32-15-110 to fund all or a portion of any multiple-fiscal year financial obligations issued by the board.

In designing and constructing a stadium pursuant to this article, the board may consider the technical and economic feasibility of including a retractable roof over such stadium; except that:

No construction costs for a retractable dome shall be part of the ballot issue proposed, nor shall any such costs be paid by any bonds, taxes, or other revenues issued under this article; and

The board shall not authorize the construction of a retractable roof without prior specific statutory authorization if any portion of the costs of construction of such retractable roof shall be paid or funded by any tax or other revenues of the district.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1056, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1488, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(1)(c), (1)(e), (1)(f)(III), (1)(f)(VI), (1)(p), (2)(a), (2)(i), (3), and (5)(c) amended and (1)(g.5), (2)(n.5), and (7) added, pp. 500, 502, §§ 2, 3, effective April 22; (2)(c) repealed, p. 154, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

IP(6)(a) and (6)(a)(I) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2055, § 71, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (1)(p) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 93, § 130, effective February 25.